Hawaii statutes.
[§147-81] Remedies and penalties not
exclusive. The penalties and remedies provided in this part with respect
to any violation of this part shall not be deemed exclusive of each other or of
other civil or criminal rights, remedies, or penalties provided or allowed by
law with respect to any such violation. [L 1983, c 177, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next